Missouri, session 2026, HB1725.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 387.420 and 387.436, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 387.420, 387.436, and 575.121, to read as
follows:
387.420. 1. Before allowing an individual to accept trip requests through a TNC's
digital network, the TNC shall:
(1) Require the individual to register with the TNC by submitting information
regarding his or her address, age, driver's license, motor vehicle registration, automobile
liability insurance, and other information required by the TNC;
(2) Conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background
check for each applicant that shall include:
(a) Multistate/multijurisdiction criminal records locator or other similar commercial
nationwide database with validation, also known as a primary source search; and
(b) United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender public website; and
[(c)] (3) Obtain and review, or have a third party obtain and review, a driving history
research report for such individual.
2. The TNC shall not permit an individual to act as a TNC driver on its digital
network who:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1725 2
(1) Has had more than three moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one
violation in the prior three-year period resulting in assessment of six or more points pursuant
to section 302.302, including but not limited to driving on a suspended or revoked license;
(2) Has been convicted, within the past five years, of a first violation of section
577.010 or 577.012, a violation of section 304.012, or resisting or interfering with arrest
where the conviction results in a class A misdemeanor;
(3) Has been convicted, within the past seven years, of a second or subsequent
violation of section 577.010 or 577.012, fraud, a sexual offense, resisting or interfering with
arrest where the conviction results in a [class E] felony of any classification, use of a motor
vehicle to commit a felony, an offense involving property damage, theft, an act of violence, or
an act of terror;
(4) Is a match in the United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender
public website;
(5) Does not possess a valid driver's license;
(6) Does not possess proof of registration for the motor vehicle or vehicles used to
provide prearranged rides;
(7) Does not possess proof of automobile liability insurance for the motor vehicle or
vehicles used to provide prearranged rides; [or]
(8) Is not at least nineteen years of age; or
(9) Is not a United States citizen or authorized to work under a current
employment authorization document.
3. A TNC driver who is qualified to accept trip requests through a TNC's digital
network pursuant to this section shall not be required to obtain any other state or local license
or permit to provide prearranged rides.
387.436. 1. Upon receipt of information that a TNC driver has been convicted of a
violation of section 304.012, 577.010, or 577.012, fraud, a sexual offense, resisting or
interfering with arrest where the conviction results in a class A misdemeanor or a felony
of any classification, use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony, an offense involving
property damage, theft, an act of violence, or an act of terror, or no longer maintains the
minimum motor vehicle financial responsibility required to be carried under chapter 303, a
TNC shall immediately revoke such driver's ability to accept trip requests through the TNC's
digital platform, and as soon as practicable, notify the department of the TNC driver's name,
license number, and license plate number.
2. Upon the expiration of an employment authorization document of a TNC
driver, a TNC shall immediately revoke such driver's ability to accept trip requests
through the TNC's digital platform, and as soon as practicable, notify the department of
the TNC driver's name, license number, and license plate number.

HB 1725 3
3. Upon receipt of information that a TNC driver has been involved in a traffic
accident or incident that results in serious bodily injury or a fatality, a TNC shall notify the
department of the driver's name, license number, and license plate number.
[3.] 4. The department shall develop and implement a process to provide any
information received under subsections 1 and 2 of this section to all other TNCs licensed in
this state.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any information provided to the
department under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under chapter 610.
575.121. 1. A person commits the offense of impersonating a transportation
network company driver if the person:
(1) Makes a false statement, uses a false display of distinctive signage or
emblems known as a trade dress, trademark, branding, or logo of the transportation
network company, or any other act that falsely represents that the person has a current
connection with a transportation network company; or
(2) Falsely represents that the person is responding to a passenger ride request
for a transportation network company.
2. Except as provided in subsections 3 and 4 of this section, the offense of
impersonating a transportation network company driver is a class A misdemeanor.
3. The offense of impersonating a transportation network company driver is a
class C felony if the person impersonates a transportation company network driver
during the commission of:
(1) Any felony offense and causes great bodily injury to another person other
than to an accomplice; or
(2) The offense of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, kidnapping in the third degree, or child kidnapping under chapter 565, or any
sexual offense under chapter 566.
4. The offense of impersonating a transportation network company driver is a
class A felony if the person impersonates a transportation company network driver
during the commission of any felony offense and causes the death of another person
other than to an accomplice.
5. Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under any other law.
✔